Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-38] Rules; finality of
determinations. The insurance commissioner shall adopt rules under chapter
91 to implement this part. The findings of fact and conclusions of law made by
the insurance commissioner in administering this part shall be final, and shall
not be subject to review by any other official or agency of the government. [L
1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next